Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.040

Private schools—Board rules for enforcement—Racial segregation or discrimination prohibited—Board rules for emergencies.

(1) The state board of education shall promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement of RCW 28A.195.010 through 28A.195.040, 28A.225.010, and 28A.305.130, including a provision which denies approval to any school engaging in a policy of racial segregation or discrimination.

(2) The state board of education has the authority to make rules and regulations that establish the terms and conditions for allowing private schools to maintain their approval status when private schools are unable to fulfill the requirement of a full school year of one hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional hour offering imposed by RCW 28A.195.010 due to a significant disruption resulting from an emergency.

(3) For purposes of this section, "emergency" has the same meaning as "emergency or disaster" in RCW 38.52.010. "Emergency" may also include a national declaration of emergency by an authorized federal official.

[ 2021 c 8 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 177; 1983 c 3 s 29; 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.02.240.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 8: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 2, 2021]." [ 2021 c 8 s 3.]